Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462.358, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Dedication. (a) The regulations may require that a reasonable portion of the buildable land, as defined by municipal ordinance, of any proposed subdivision be dedicated to the public or preserved for public use as streets, roads,new text begin sidewalks,new text end sewers, electric, gas, and water facilities, stormwater drainage and holding areas or ponds and similar utilities and improvements, parks, recreational facilities as defined in section 471.191, playgrounds, trails, wetlands, or open space. The requirement must be imposed by ordinance or under the procedures established in section 462.353, subdivision 4a. (b) If a municipality adopts the ordinance or proceeds under section 462.353, subdivision 4a, as required by paragraph (a), the municipality must adopt a capital improvement budget and have a parks and open space plan or have a parks, trails, and open space component in its comprehensive plan subject to the terms and conditions in this paragraph and paragraphs (c) to (i). (c) The municipality may choose to accept a cash fee as set by ordinance from the applicant for some or all of the new lots created in the subdivision, based on the average fair market value of the unplatted land for which park fees have not already been paid that is, no later than at the time of final approval or under the city's adopted comprehensive plan, to be served by municipal sanitary sewer and water service or community septic and private well as authorized by state law. For purposes of redevelopment on developed land, the municipality may choose to accept a cash fee based on fair market value of the land no later than the time of final approval. "Fair market value" means the value of the land as determined by the municipality annually based on tax valuation or other relevant data. If the municipality's calculation of valuation is objected to by the applicant, then the value shall be as negotiated between the municipality and the applicant, or based on the market value as determined by the municipality based on an independent appraisal of land in a same or similar land use category. (d) In establishing the portion to be dedicated or preserved or the cash fee, the regulations shall give due consideration to the open space, recreational, or common areas and facilities open to the public that the applicant proposes to reserve for the subdivision. (e) The municipality must reasonably determine that it will need to acquire that portion of land for the purposes stated in this subdivision as a result of approval of the subdivision. (f) Cash payments received must be placed by the municipality in a special fund to be used only for the purposes for which the money was obtained.new text begin The municipality must maintain records detailing the purposes for which the money was obtained and the manner in which the municipality spent the money to further those purposes. The municipality must make the records readily available to the applicant upon request.new text end (g) Cash payments received must be used only for the acquisition and development or improvement of parks, recreational facilities, playgrounds, trails, wetlands, or open space based on the approved park systems plan. Cash payments must not be used for ongoing operation or maintenance of parks, recreational facilities, playgrounds, trails, wetlands, or open space.new text begin The municipality must maintain records demonstrating the manner in which the municipality used each cash payment.new text end (h) The municipality must not deny the approval of a subdivision based solely on an inadequate supply of parks, open spaces, trails, or recreational facilities within the municipality. (i) Previously subdivided property from which a park dedication has been received, being resubdivided with the same number of lots, is exempt from park dedication requirements. If, as a result of resubdividing the property, the number of lots is increased, then the park dedication or per-lot cash fee must apply only to the net increase of lots. new text begin (j) The municipality may accept a combination of buildable land and cash fees to satisfy the municipality's dedication requirements set by ordinance pursuant to this subdivision or the procedures established in section 462.353, subdivision 4a. The municipality may require buildable land, cash fees, or a combination of both, to be dedicated for the purposes described in paragraph (a), the total value of which must not exceed ten percent of the fair market value of the proposed subdivision. Land in the proposed subdivision that is not buildable may be dedicated, and the value of that land is not factored into the ten percent limit on the total value of the dedication. Land in the proposed subdivision that is dedicated because of its current or potential use for regional trails applies to the ten percent limit on the total value of the dedication unless the land is already dedicated for street, road, or right-of-way purposes. new text end new text begin (k) The municipality must not require a dedication of land for streets, roads, or right-of-way to a width that exceeds the minimum engineering standards for urban roadways, as adopted in administrative rules by the commissioner of transportation for the municipal state-aid street system, as provided under sections 162.09, subdivision 1, and 162.155. new text end new text begin (l) A dedication of land for a street that is not a collector or arterial street must not exceed the amount of land required to construct the street with a curb-to-curb width of 32 feet and associated utilities and sidewalks, if sidewalks are included in the plan for the proposed subdivision. The municipality must apply guidance established by national traffic engineering organizations when designing these streets. new text end